Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 3

State Forester

11-4-301. Selection — Powers and duties.

The commission shall submit to the governor the names of three (3) qualified individuals for the position of state forester. From these nominees, one (1) individual may be selected for such position. The person so appointed shall have not less than five (5) years' experience in the management of state, federal or private forests and shall have as a minimum a bachelor's degree in forestry from an institution accredited by the Society of American Foresters.

The state forester shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and shall be paid a salary as approved by the department of human resources. Unless otherwise provided by the commissioner, the existing state forester shall serve as the state forester under this chapter and the commission shall not submit the names of nominees pursuant to § 11-4-201(i)(1) until such time as a vacancy occurs in such position.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The state forester, under the general supervision of the commissioner, has the duty and responsibility to:

Have knowledge of all forest interests and all matters pertaining to forestry within the state;

Select and employ the personnel of the division in accordance with personnel regulations as established by the department of human resources;

Supervise the employees of the division;

Implement and administer the programs and policies of the division;

Take action to effectively prevent and suppress wildland fires;

Enforce laws and regulations pertaining to forests in the state and recommend prosecution for violators;

Promote and conduct educational activities in the interest of forest conservation;

Cooperate with private landowners in planning for protection, management and replacement of forests;

Compile statistics of forest conditions, resources and management programs;

Protect and manage lands designated as state forests;

Prepare long-range comprehensive plans for the protection, development, and utilization of the state's forest resources;

Cooperate with the public and private forestry interests, government entities and private organizations to promote the efficient marketing and utilization of the state's forest resource;

Prepare and submit to the commissioner and the commission the annual budget request for the division and an annual report concerning division activities and accomplishments;

Collect and distribute data relative to forest problems and conditions and to supervise the enforcement of forestry laws;

Cooperate with federal, state, and local governmental entities, private organizations, and individuals in programs and activities that promote the protection, development, conservation, and wise utilization of the state's forests, including the reforestation and reclamation of eroding and other unproductive lands;

Serve as compact administrator for the state in matters pertaining to the Southeast Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact as outlined in part 5 of this chapter;

Develop and distribute information about forest resource conditions and division programs and conduct educational activities in the interest of forest conservation; and

With approval of the commissioner, promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the Tennessee Forestry Code.

Acts 1921, ch. 156, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 29, 30; Shan. Supp. §§ 325a111, 325a112; Code 1932, §§ 550, 552; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 630.8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-403; Acts 1984, ch. 978, § 1; 1986, ch. 652, §§ 8, 48; T.C.A., § 11-4-103.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3 (§§ 11-4-301 — 11-4-305), concerning the Southeast Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact, was transferred to part 5 of this chapter in 1986.

For transfer of the division of forestry and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (ch. 4 of this title) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

Pursuant to Acts 2007, ch. 60, references to the department of personnel were changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

Cross-References. Claims by emergency forest firefighters, § 9-8-307.

Negligent handling of fires near forest, penalty, damages, § 39-14-305.

Powers of department of environment and conservation, § 4-3-504.

Purchase of timber, § 39-14-410.

Setting fire to forest, penalty, § 39-14-303.

State forester means director of the division of forestry, § 11-4-103.

Vandalism, § 39-14-408.

11-4-302. Sale, exchange or lease of lands.

The state forester, by and with the approval of the commissioner of agriculture, has the authority to recommend the sale, exchange, or lease of lands under the jurisdiction of the division when, in the judgment of the state forester, it is advantageous to the state to do so, in the highest orderly development and management of the state forests.

Such sale, lease or exchange shall not be contrary to the terms of any contract which has been entered into heretofore. Such sale, lease or exchange shall be made pursuant to the laws governing the disposal of state property.

Acts 1937, ch. 280, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.17 (Williams, § 630.20); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-412; Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 9; T.C.A., § 11-4-112.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3 (§§ 11-4-301 — 11-4-305), concerning the Southeast Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact, was transferred to part 5 of this chapter in 1986.